fr/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/fr.aff
FLAG long
SFX c3 évrer èvrerais/t' évrer
SFX c3 éyer èyerais/t' éyer
SFX c3 er erait/s' er
SFX c3 ébrer èbrerait/s' ébrer
SFX c3 écer ècerait/s' écer
SFX c3 écher ècherait/s' écher
SFX c3 écrer ècrerait/s' écrer
SFX c3 éder èderait/s' éder
SFX c3 éger ègerait/s' éger
SFX c3 égler èglerait/s' égler
SFX c3 égner ègnerait/s' égner
SFX c3 égrer ègrerait/s' égrer
SFX c3 éguer èguerait/s' éguer
SFX c3 éler èlerait/s' éler
SFX c3 émer èmerait/s' émer
SFX c3 éner ènerait/s' éner
SFX c3 éper èperait/s' éper
SFX c3 équer èquerait/s' équer
SFX c3 érer èrerait/s' érer
SFX c3 éser èserait/s' éser
SFX c3 éter èterait/s' éter
SFX c3 étrer ètrerait/s' étrer
SFX c3 évrer èvrerait/s' évrer
SFX c3 éyer èyerait/s' éyer
SFX c3 er erions er
SFX c3 ébrer èbrerions ébrer
SFX c3 écer ècerions écer
SFX c3 écher ècherions écher
SFX c3 écrer ècrerions écrer
SFX c3 éder èderions éder
SFX c3 éger ègerions éger
SFX c3 égler èglerions égler
SFX c3 égner ègnerions égner
SFX c3 égrer ègrerions égrer
SFX c3 éguer èguerions éguer
SFX c3 éler èlerions éler
SFX c3 émer èmerions émer
SFX c3 éner ènerions éner
SFX c3 éper èperions éper
SFX c3 équer èquerions équer
SFX c3 érer èrerions érer
SFX c3 éser èserions éser
SFX c3 éter èterions éter
SFX c3 étrer ètrerions étrer
SFX c3 évrer èvrerions évrer
SFX c3 éyer èyerions éyer
SFX c3 er eriez er
SFX c3 ébrer èbreriez ébrer
SFX c3 écer èceriez écer
SFX c3 écher ècheriez écher
SFX c3 écrer ècreriez écrer
SFX c3 éder èderiez éder
SFX c3 éger ègeriez éger
SFX c3 égler ègleriez égler
SFX c3 égner ègneriez égner
SFX c3 égrer ègreriez égrer
SFX c3 éguer ègueriez éguer
SFX c3 éler èleriez éler
SFX c3 émer èmeriez émer
SFX c3 éner èneriez éner
SFX c3 éper èperiez éper
SFX c3 équer èqueriez équer
SFX c3 érer èreriez érer
SFX c3 éser èseriez éser
SFX c3 éter èteriez éter
SFX c3 étrer ètreriez étrer
SFX c3 évrer èvreriez évrer
SFX c3 éyer èyeriez éyer
SFX c3 er eraient/s' er
SFX c3 ébrer èbreraient/s' ébrer
SFX c3 écer èceraient/s' écer
SFX c3 écher ècheraient/s' écher
SFX c3 écrer ècreraient/s' écrer
SFX c3 éder èderaient/s' éder
SFX c3 éger ègeraient/s' éger
SFX c3 égler ègleraient/s' égler
SFX c3 égner ègneraient/s' égner
SFX c3 égrer ègreraient/s' égrer
SFX c3 éguer ègueraient/s' éguer
SFX c3 éler èleraient/s' éler
SFX c3 émer èmeraient/s' émer
SFX c3 éner èneraient/s' éner
SFX c3 éper èperaient/s' éper
SFX c3 équer èqueraient/s' équer
SFX c3 érer èreraient/s' érer
SFX c3 éser èseraient/s' éser
SFX c3 éter èteraient/s' éter
SFX c3 étrer ètreraient/s' étrer
SFX c3 évrer èvreraient/s' évrer
SFX c3 éyer èyeraient/s' éyer
SFX c3 ébrer èbre/m' ébrer
SFX c3 écer èce/m' écer
SFX c3 écher èche/m' écher
SFX c3 écrer ècre/m' écrer
SFX c3 éder ède/m' éder
SFX c3 éger ège/m' éger
SFX c3 égler ègle/m' égler
SFX c3 égner ègne/m' égner
SFX c3 égrer ègre/m' égrer
SFX c3 éguer ègue/m' éguer
SFX c3 éler èle/m' éler
SFX c3 émer ème/m' émer
SFX c3 éner ène/m' éner
SFX c3 éper èpe/m' éper
SFX c3 équer èque/m' équer
SFX c3 érer ère/m' érer
SFX c3 éser èse/m' éser
SFX c3 éter ète/m' éter
SFX c3 étrer ètre/m' étrer
SFX c3 évrer èvre/m' évrer
SFX c3 éyer èye/m' éyer
SFX c3 ébrer èbres/t' ébrer
SFX c3 écer èces/t' écer
SFX c3 écher èches/t' écher
SFX c3 écrer ècres/t' écrer
SFX c3 éder èdes/t' éder
SFX c3 éger èges/t' éger
SFX c3 égler ègles/t' égler
SFX c3 égner ègnes/t' égner
SFX c3 égrer ègres/t' égrer
SFX c3 éguer ègues/t' éguer
SFX c3 éler èles/t' éler
SFX c3 émer èmes/t' émer
SFX c3 éner ènes/t' éner
SFX c3 éper èpes/t' éper
SFX c3 équer èques/t' équer
SFX c3 érer ères/t' érer
SFX c3 éser èses/t' éser
SFX c3 éter ètes/t' éter
SFX c3 étrer ètres/t' étrer
SFX c3 évrer èvres/t' évrer
SFX c3 éyer èyes/t' éyer
SFX c3 ébrer èbre/s' ébrer
SFX c3 écer èce/s' écer
SFX c3 écher èche/s' écher
SFX c3 écrer ècre/s' écrer
SFX c3 éder ède/s' éder
SFX c3 éger ège/s' éger
SFX c3 égler ègle/s' égler
SFX c3 égner ègne/s' égner
SFX c3 égrer ègre/s' égrer
SFX c3 éguer ègue/s' éguer
SFX c3 éler èle/s' éler
SFX c3 émer ème/s' émer
SFX c3 éner ène/s' éner
SFX c3 éper èpe/s' éper
SFX c3 équer èque/s' équer
SFX c3 érer ère/s' érer
SFX c3 éser èse/s' éser
SFX c3 éter ète/s' éter
SFX c3 étrer ètre/s' étrer
SFX c3 évrer èvre/s' évrer
SFX c3 éyer èye/s' éyer
SFX c3 er ions er
SFX c3 er iez er
SFX c3 ébrer èbrent/s' ébrer
SFX c3 écer ècent/s' écer
SFX c3 écher èchent/s' écher
SFX c3 écrer ècrent/s' écrer
SFX c3 éder èdent/s' éder
SFX c3 éger ègent/s' éger
SFX c3 égler èglent/s' égler
SFX c3 égner ègnent/s' égner
SFX c3 égrer ègrent/s' égrer
SFX c3 éguer èguent/s' éguer
SFX c3 éler èlent/s' éler
SFX c3 émer èment/s' émer
SFX c3 éner ènent/s' éner
SFX c3 éper èpent/s' éper
SFX c3 équer èquent/s' équer
SFX c3 érer èrent/s' érer
SFX c3 éser èsent/s' éser
SFX c3 éter ètent/s' éter
SFX c3 étrer ètrent/s' étrer
SFX c3 évrer èvrent/s' évrer
SFX c3 éyer èyent/s' éyer
SFX c3 er asse/m' [^cg]er
SFX c3 écer éçasse/m' écer
SFX c3 éger égeasse/m' éger
SFX c3 er asses/t' [^cg]er
SFX c3 écer éçasses/t' écer
SFX c3 éger égeasses/t' éger
SFX c3 er ât/s' [^cg]er
SFX c3 écer éçât/s' écer
SFX c3 éger égeât/s' éger
SFX c3 er assions [^cg]er
SFX c3 écer éçassions écer
SFX c3 éger égeassions éger
SFX c3 er assiez [^cg]er
SFX c3 écer éçassiez écer
SFX c3 éger égeassiez éger
SFX c3 er assent/s' [^cg]er
SFX c3 écer éçassent/s' écer
SFX c3 éger égeassent/s' éger
